Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 61.
COUNTY ROAD TAX (CONST. AMEND. 3, REPEALED; AND SECTION ADDED).

County quorum courts may annually levy a county road tax not to exceed three (3) mills on the dollar on all taxable real and personal property within their respective counties. Revenues derived from the county road tax shall be used for the sole purpose of constructing and repairing public roads and bridges within the county wherein levied. The authority granted by this amendment shall be in addition to all other taxing authority of the county quorum courts.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by S.J.R. No. 1 (see Acts 1981, p. 2374(ii)) and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on March 30, 1981. It was approved at the general election on Nov. 2, 1982, by a vote of 362,009 for and 322,504 against.

Section 2 of Ark. Const. Amend. 61, repealed Ark. Const. Amend. 3.